dev/verbs-apertium-kaz-tat.kaz.lexc
LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
N1 ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
:%>ш%{A%} N1 ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON NP-COMMON
N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
!%<adj%>%<top%>:%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} ADJ-COMMON ;  ! FIXME: do these tags make sense?

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./
 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASE ; 

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

LEXICON POST 

%<post%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>: CLIT ;

!LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI (Why commented out - see note in the Adverbs section
!                    of the Root Lexicon /12072012 I.S./
!ADV ;
!:%>%{G%}%{I%} A2 ; 

!LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI-I     ! Used only for бері<adv>/бергі<adj> right now
!
!і:%{I%} ADV ;
!гі:гі A3 ; 

LEXICON ADVITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: # ; 

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON CS

%<cnjsub%>: # ; 

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ; 

LEXICON QST

%<qst%>: # ; 

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR 

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ModalParticles

ма:ма QST ; ! "" Dir/RL
ма:ма QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:ба QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:па QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:ме QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:бе QST ; ! "" Dir/LR
ма:пе QST ; ! "" Dir/LR

LEXICON Conjunctions

! FIXME: Section is to be checked later for miscategorizations
!        [although these miscategorizations shouldn't affect much the coverage of
!        translator, since they are part of tat.lexc too :) ] /I.S./

! Co-ordinating conjunctions

!! Соединительные

да:%~да CC ; ! "also" Dir/RL
да:да CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:де CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:та CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:те CC ; ! ""       Dir/LR

және:және CC ; ! "and"
не:не CC ; ! "neither... , nor ... (x2)" ! FIXME:NOTE: disambig
түгіл:түгіл CC ; ! "не только, но даже" #! Ол сен түгіл, мені де танымады. FIXME:CHECK
әрі:әрі CC ; ! "and (x2)" FIXME:DISAMBIG: from "әрі<adv>" (as adverb it is not repeated)

!! Противительные

ал:ал CC ; ! "contrastive and"
бірақ:бірақ CC ; ! "but"
тек:тек CC ; ! "but,just"

!! Разделительные

біресе:біресе CC ; ! "то ... , то ... (x2)"
немесе:немесе CC ; ! "or"
я:я CC ; ! "or"

! Sub-ordinating conjunctions

егер:егер CS ; ! "if"
егерде:егерде CS ; ! "if"
себебі:себебі CS ; ! "because"    ! FIXME:NOTE: disambig from "себеп.n.px3sg"
яғни:яғни CS ; ! "that is, то есть"
өйткені:өйткені CS ; ! "because"

! Adverbial conjunctions = "Относительные слова"

алайда:алайда CA ; ! "nevertheless"
басқаша% айтканда:басқаша% айтканда CA ; ! ""
дегенмен:дегенмен CA ; ! "nevertheless"
осы% себептен:осы% себептен CA ; ! "therefore"
сондықтан:сондықтан CA ; ! "that is why"
сөйтсе% де:сөйтсе% де CA ; ! "nevertheless"
сөйтсе:сөйтсе CA ; ! "nevertheless"
әйтпесе:әйтпесе CA ; ! ""
әйтсе% де:әйтсе% де CA ; ! "nevertheless"

айтуынша:айтуынша CA ; ! ""
мәлімдеуінше:мәлімдеуінше CA ; ! ""
пікірінше:пікірінше CA ; ! ""
сөздерінше:сөздерінше CA ; ! ""
хабарлауынша:хабарлауынша CA ; ! ""

LEXICON Postadverbs 

-ақ:%>-ақ POSTADV ; ! ""     ! FIXME:CHECK (note that it concatenates to the preceeding word)

ғана:%~ғана POSTADV ; ! Dir/RL
ғана:ғана POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR
ғана:қана POSTADV ;   ! "only" Dir/LR

да:%~да POSTADV ; ! "1. even if"     Dir/RL
да:да POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:де POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:та POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR
да:те POSTADV ; ! ""       Dir/LR

тағы POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too" ! FIXME:CHECK pos
тегіс POSTADV ; ! "entirely/all/all together"


!================!
 LEXICON Pronouns
!================!


PRON-PERS ;  ! Personal pronouns

PRON-DEM ;   ! Demonstrative pronouns

PRON-ITG ;   ! Interrogative pronouns

бірдеме:бірдеме PRON-IND ; ! "something"          ! pronoun
басқа:басқа PRON-IND ; ! "other"
! бәрі PRON-IND ; ! "everyone"  !!! This is an alternate of below ! FIXME: true for Kazakh too?
бәрі:бәр PRON-IND-POSS ; ! "everyone"  ! FIXME: in the end, this really shouldn't create <px*> tags too (same problem for kymorph)

барлық:барлық PRON-QNT ; ! ""

еш% нәрсе:еш% нәрсе PRNNEG ; ! "" Use/MT
ешкім:ешкім PRNNEG ; ! ""

өз:өз PRON-REF ; ! "self"

бири%-бир:бири%-бир PRON-RECIP ; ! "each other, one another"

LEXICON Determiners

анау:анау DET-DEM ;
бұл:бұл DET-DEM ;
мынау:мынау DET-DEM ;
осы:осы DET-DEM ;
сол:сол DET-DEM ;
сонау:сонау DET-DEM ;
әлгі:әлгі DET-DEM ; ! "~этот"

бар:бар DET-QNT ; ! "all"
барлық:барлық DET-QNT ; ! "all"
бірқатар:бірқатар DET-QNT ; ! "several"
бірнеше:бірнеше DET-QNT ; ! "some"
бүкіл:бүкіл DET-QNT ; ! "whole"
әрбір:әрбір DET-QNT ; ! "each"
әрбір:һәрбір DET-QNT ; ! "each" Dir/LR
әр:әр DET-QNT ; ! "every"
әртүрлі:әртүрлі DET-QNT ; ! "~every kind"
әр:һәр DET-QNT ; ! "every" Dir/LR
көптеген:көптеген DET-QNT ; ! "many"

әлдебір:әлдебір DET-IND ; ! "a"
бір:бір DET-IND ; ! "a"
кейбір:кейбір DET-IND ; ! "some"
қайсыбір:қайсыбір DET-IND ; ! "some"

қай:қай DET-ITG ; ! "which"
қайсы:қайсы DET-ITG ; ! "which"

ешбір:ешбір DET-NEG ; ! "none, no"
ешқандай:ешқандай DET-NEG ; ! "no [kind of], none"

өз:өз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"

!!! FIXME: Check these

!!!! Determiners, pronouns, etc. of various sorts
!неше:неше DET-QNT ; ! "how many"        ! interrog. quantifier
қанша:қанша DET-QNT ; ! "how many"       ! interrog. quantifier

!=====================!   
 LEXICON Interjections 
!=====================!


ә:ә INTERJ ; ! ""
әйе:әйе INTERJ ; ! "yes"
әлбетте:әлбетте INTERJ ; ! "of course"
әрине:әрине INTERJ ; ! "of course"
болыпты:болыпты INTERJ ; ! "okay / that's it"
демек:демек INTERJ ; ! "that is"
дұрыс:дұрыс INTERJ ; ! "right"
жарайды:жарайды INTERJ ; ! "okay / it'll do"
жоқ:жоқ INTERJ ; ! "no"
иә:иә INTERJ ; ! "yes"
қане:қане INTERJ ; ! "where"           ! interrog. interjection (question form of "вот")
мақұл:мақұл INTERJ ; ! "fine/okay"
мә:мә INTERJ ; ! "here you go / take"
мейлі:мейлі INTERJ ; ! "okay/fine"
міне:міне INTERJ ; ! "here is, вот"
мына:мына INTERJ ; ! "here is, вот"
ой:ой INTERJ ; ! "hey"
ондай% болса:ондай% болса INTERJ ; ! "in that case"
онда:онда INTERJ ; ! "then"
түсінікті:түсінікті INTERJ ; ! "understood"

! Вводные слова
!==============

айтпақшы:айтпақшы INTERJ ; ! ""
бәлкім:бәлкім INTERJ ; ! ""
есесіне:есесіне INTERJ ; ! ""
мәселен:мәселен INTERJ ; ! "e.g."
мысалы:мысалы INTERJ ; ! "e.g."

LEXICON Postpositions
бұрын:бұрын POST ; ! "before, ago" + NOM
секілді:секілді POST ; ! "like, как будто" + NOM 
хақында:хақында POST ; ! "about, concerning" + NOM
мен:бен POST ; ! "with" + NOM       ! Dir/LR
қарағанда:қарағанда POST ; ! "according to; than(?)" + DAT
шейін:шейін POST ; ! "until, up to, as far as = дейін" + DAT
бойымен:бойымен POST ;
қабат:қабат POST ;
LEXICON Numerals
төрт:төрт NUM ; ! "four"
сегіз:сегіз NUM ; ! "eight" 
он% екі:он% екі NUM ; ! "twelve"       ! tatar numerals are written as one word
он% алты:он% алты NUM ; ! "sixteen"
жиырма:жиырма NUM ; ! "twenty"         ! FIXME: This has an exceptional ordinal form: жиырмасыншы
алпыс:алпыс NUM ; ! "sixty"
жүз:жүз NUM ; ! "hundred"
миллиард:миллиард NUM ; ! "billion"
бір:біреу NUM-COLL ;
екі:екеу NUM-COLL ;
үш:үшеу NUM-COLL ;
төрт:төртеу NUM-COLL ;
бес:бесеу NUM-COLL ;
алтау:алтау NUM-COLL ;
жетеу:жетеу NUM-COLL ;
III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
V NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
неше:неше NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON Nouns
грек:грек NAT ; ! "Greek"
Калмак:Калмак NAT ; ! "Kalmyk" 
қазақ:қазақ NAT ; ! "Kazakh"
қытай:қытай NAT ; ! "Chinese"
моңғол:моңғол NAT ; ! "Mongol"
неміс:неміс NAT ; ! "German"
өзбек:өзбек NAT ; ! "Uzbek"
татар:татар NAT ; ! "Tatar"
француз:француз NAT ; ! "French"
 LEXICON ProperNouns 
Жасарал:Жасарал NP-TOP ; ! ""
Өскемен:Өскемен NP-TOP ; ! "Ust-Kamenogorsk"
Англия:Англия NP-TOP ; ! "England"
Ирак:Ирак NP-TOP ; ! "Iraq"
Ресей:Ресей NP-TOP ; ! "Russia"
Бейжің:Бейжің NP-TOP ; ! ""
Орхус:Орхус NP-TOP ; ! ""
Әмудария:Амудария NP-TOP ; ! "" Dir/LR
Тянь%-Шань:Тянь%-Шань NP-TOP ; ! "mountain"
Алиса:Алиса NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Аманкелді:Аманкелді NP-ANT-M; ! "Amankeldi" (Kazakh)
Әжіғали:Әжіғали NP-ANT-M; ! "Äjiğalıy" (Kazakh)
Әсем:Әсем NP-ANT-F; ! "Äsem" (Kazakh)
Белгібай:Белгібай NP-ANT-M; ! "Belgibay" (Old Turkic)
Гүлажар:Гүлажар NP-ANT-F; ! "Gülajar" (Kazakh)
Ділда:Ділда NP-ANT-F; ! "Dilda" (Arabic)
Емел:Емел NP-ANT-M; ! "Emel" (Arabic)
Жүсіпқали:Жүсіпқали NP-ANT-M; ! "Jüsipqalıy" (Arabic)
Зия:Зия NP-ANT-F; ! "Zıya" (Arabic)
Құрмантай:Құрмантай NP-ANT-M; ! "Qurmantay" (Arabic)
Қырмызы:Қырмызы NP-ANT-F; ! "Qırmızı" (Kazakh)
Нұғман:Нұғман NP-ANT-M; ! "Nuğman" 
Розлана:Розлана NP-ANT-F ; ! "" 
Сасан:Сасан NP-ANT-M; ! "Sasan" (Persian)
Шайхы:Шайхы NP-ANT-M; ! "Shayxı" (Arabic)
Ырысбала:Ырысбала NP-ANT-F; ! "Irısbala" (Arabic)
Әл%-Масуди:Әл%-Масуди NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Бартушка:Бартушка NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Гейтс:Гейтс NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Жовтис:Жовтис NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кастро:Кастро NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ли:Ли NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Обама:Обама NP-COG-MF ; ! "Obama"
Тимошенко:Тимошенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Аширбаев:Аширбаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Белов:Белов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Горбунов:Горбунов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Есжанов:Есжанов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Корсаков:Корсаков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мироваев:Мироваев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Рәзиев:Рәзиев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Тоқомбаев:Тоқомбаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Consolidated% Contractors% Company:Consolidated% Contractors% Company NP-ORG ; ! ""
Freedom% House:Freedom% House NP-ORG ; ! ""
Investment:Investment NP-ORG ; ! ""
Kazakhmys% Plc:Kazakhmys% Plc NP-ORG ; ! ""
Plc:Plc NP-ORG ; ! ""
Амнести% Интернэшнл:Амнести% Интернэшнл NP-ORG ; ! ""
Жайықмұнайгаз:Жайықмұнайгаз NP-ORG ; ! ""
Темелин:Темелин NP-ORG ; ! ""
Independent:Independent NP-AL ; ! ""
Petroleum:Petroleum NP-AL ; ! ""
Witness:Witness NP-AL ; ! ""
Глобал:Глобал NP-AL ; ! ""
Ил:Ил NP-AL ; ! ""
Қазақмыс:Қазақмыс NP-AL ; ! ""
Свобода:Свобода NP-AL ; ! ""
Худуд%-ал% Алам:Худуд%-ал% Алам NP-AL ; ! "" Use/MT
 LEXICON Adverbs
қайда:қайда ADVITG ; ! "where (где;куда)"
қалай:қалай ADVITG ; ! "how"
қашан:қашан ADVITG ; ! "when"
неғұрлым:неғұрлым ADVITG ; ! ""
әбден:әбден ADV ; ! "extremely"
әрдайым:әрдайым ADV ; ! "always"
бірте%-бірте:бірте%-бірте ADV ; ! ""
еш:һеш ADV ; ! "non,any,not" Dir/LR
көптеп:көптеп ADV ; ! ""
тағы:тағы ADV ; ! "more"
бағана:бағана ADV ; ! "just now > the one just now" FIXME: gloss
кеше:кеше ADV ; ! "yesterday > yesterday's"
 LEXICON Abbreviations
KPO:KPO ABBR ; ! ""
б%.з%.д%.:б%.з%.д%. ABBR ; ! "BCE"
ВИЧ:ВИЧ ABBR ; ! ""
ж%.:ж%. ABBR ; ! "year"
кг:кг ABBR ; ! "kg"
Қазатомпром:Қазатомпром ABBR ; ! ""
мм:мм ABBR ; ! "mm"
ССРО:ССРО ABBR ; ! ""
